Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,230
Violations; civil actions.

(1) Any state or local government may commence a civil action against an owner or operator of a facility for failure to:

(a) Provide notification to the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency under subsection (1) of section 81-15,218;

(b) Submit a material safety data sheet or a list of chemicals under section 81-15,223;

(c) Make available information requested under subsections (3) and (4) of section 81-15,223; and

(d) Complete and submit a tier II inventory form under section 81-15,224.

(2) The Nebraska Emergency Management Agency, the director, or a local emergency planning committee may commence a civil action against an owner or operator of a facility for failure to provide information under section 81-15,219 or for failure to submit tier II information under subsection (5) of section 81-15,224.

(3) The state may commence a civil action against the administrator for failure to provide information to the state under section 322(g) of Title III.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 40;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 55.
July 1, 2026